Utah statutes.
53A-2-204.   District paying tuition -- Effect on state aid.

(1)  A local school board may by written agreement pay the tuition of a child attending school in a district outside the state.  Both districts shall approve the agreement and file it with the State Board of Education.

(2)  The average daily membership of the child may be added to that of other eligible children attending schools within the district of residence for the purpose of apportionment of state funds.

(3)  The district of residence shall bear any excess tuition costs over the state's contribution for attendance in the district of residence unless otherwise approved in advance by the State Board of Education.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

